Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2606
Board; powers and duties; hearing.

(1) After reviewing an application submitted under section 13-2605 and upon reasonable notice to the applicant, the board shall hold a public hearing on the application.

(2) The board shall give notice of the time, place, and purpose of the public hearing by publication three times in a newspaper of statewide circulation. Such publication shall be not less than ten days prior to the hearing. The notice shall describe generally the facilities for which state assistance has been requested. The applicant shall pay the cost of the notice.

(3) At the public hearing, representatives of the applicant and any other interested persons may appear and present evidence and argument in support of or in opposition to the application or neutral testimony. The board may seek expert testimony and may require testimony of persons whom the board desires to comment on the application. The board may provide for the acceptance of additional evidence after conclusion of the public hearing.

Laws 1999, LB 382, § 6.

Limitation on applications, see section 13-2612.